Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.030

Purposes.

The purposes of RCW 28A.545.030 through 28A.545.110 and 84.52.0531 are to:

(1) Simplify the annual process of determining and paying the amounts due by nonhigh school districts to high school districts for educating students residing in a nonhigh school district;

(2) Provide for a payment schedule that coincides to the extent practicable with the ability of nonhigh school districts to pay and the need of high school districts for payment;

(3) Establish that the maximum amount due per annual average full-time equivalent student by a nonhigh school district for each school year is the lesser of:

(a) The enrichment levy rate per annual average full-time equivalent student levied upon the taxpayers of the high school district; or

(b) The enrichment levy rate per annual average full-time equivalent student levied upon the taxpayers of the nonhigh school district;

(4) If the nonhigh school district has not levied an enrichment levy during the current school year, then the amount due per annual average full-time equivalent student by the nonhigh school district is the enrichment levy rate per annual average full-time equivalent student levied upon the taxpayers of the high school district; and

(5) Designate the revenue provided to secondary school buildings to ensure dollars are being spent to support secondary school students.

[ 2020 c 225 s 1; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 1001; 1990 c 33 s 488; 1981 c 264 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.44.150.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 1001 and 1002: "Sections 1001 and 1002 of this act take effect January 1, 2019." [ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 1007.]

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Severability—1981 c 264: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 264 s 13.]